nl: Compatibel intercomsysteem: Compatibel met klembevestiging; Klaar voor geïntegreerd systeem (eigen); Niet compatibel met intercom; Luidsprekervakken/-uitsparingen; Overig
cs: Kompatibilní systém intercom: Kompatibilní s upínacím držákem (clamp-mount); Připraveno pro integrovaný systém (proprietární); Nekompatibilní s interkomem; Kapsy/výřezy pro reproduktory; Jiné
tr: Uyumlu interkom sistemi: Kelepçe montajı uyumlu; Entegre sisteme hazır (tescilli); İnterkom uyumlu değil; Hoparlör cepleri/yuvaları; Diğer
ru: Совместимая система интеркома: Совместимо с креплением-зажимом; Готовность к встроенной системе (проприетарной); Несовместимо с интеркомом; Карманы / вырезы для динамиков; Другое
ro-RO: Sistem de interfon compatibil: Compatibil cu montură tip clemă; Pregătit pentru sistem integrat (deținut); Incompatibil cu interfon; Buzunare/decupaje pentru difuzoare; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis intercom rendszer: Bilincses rögzítéssel kompatibilis; Integrált rendszerhez előkészített (saját / védett); Nem intercom-kompatibilis; Hangszórózsebek/-kivágások; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibelt intercom-system: Kompatibel med klemmemontering; Klargjort for integrert system (proprietært); Ikke intercom-kompatibel; Høyttalerlommer/-utskjæringer; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinama domofono sistema: Suderinama su spaustukais; Paruošta integruotai sistemai (nuosavybinė); Nesuderinama su pasikalbėjimo įranga; Garsiakalbių kišenės / išpjovos; Kita
en: Compatible intercom system: Clamp-mount compatible; Integrated system ready (proprietary); Not intercom compatible; Speaker pockets/cutouts; Other
da: Kompatibelt intercom-system: Kompatibel med klemmebeslag; Forberedt til integreret system (navnebeskyttet); Ikke kompatibel med samtaleanlæg; Højttalerlommer/-udskæringer; Andet
pt-PT: Sistema de intercomunicação compatível: Compatível com montagem em braçadeira; Pronto para sistema integrado (proprietário); Não compatível com intercomunicador; Bolsas/recortes para altifalantes; Outro
th: ระบบอินเตอร์คอมที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: รองรับตัวยึดแบบแคลมป์; รองรับระบบในตัว (กรรมสิทธิ์); ไม่รองรับอินเตอร์คอม; ช่อง/รูลำโพง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém intercom: Kompatibilné s držiakom so svorkou; Pripravené na integrovaný systém (proprietárny); Nekompatibilné s interkomom; Vrecká/výrezy na reproduktory; Iné
ja: 対応インターコムシステム: クランプマウント対応; 統合システム対応 (独自の); インターコム非対応; スピーカーポケット/カットアウト; その他
bg-BG: Съвместима интерком система: Съвместимо със захващаща скоба; Готово за интегрирана система (собствена); Не е съвместимо с интерком; Джобове/отвори за високоговорители; Друго
fi: Yhteensopiva sisäpuhelinjärjestelmä: Puristinkiinnitysyhteensopiva; Valmis integroituun järjestelmään (omistusoikeudellinen); Ei intercom-yhteensopiva; Kaiutintaskut / -upotukset; Muu
pt-BR: Sistema de intercomunicação compatível: Compatível com suporte de abraçadeira; Preparado para sistema integrado (proprietário); Não compatível com interfone; Recortes/bolsos para alto-falante; Outro
it: Sistema intercom compatibile: Compatibile con montaggio a morsetto; Predisposizione per sistema integrato (proprietario); Non compatibile con interfono; Tasche/ritagli per altoparlanti; Altro
es: Sistema de intercomunicador compatible: Compatible con montaje de abrazadera; Preparado para sistema integrado (patentado); No compatible con intercomunicador; Bolsillos/recortes para altavoces; Otro
el: Συμβατό σύστημα ενδοεπικοινωνίας: Συμβατό με βάση σύσφιξης; Έτοιμο για ενσωματωμένο σύστημα (ιδιόκτητο); Μη συμβατό με ενδοεπικοινωνία; Εσοχές/υποδοχές για ηχεία; Άλλο
sl-SI: Združljiv domofonski sistem: Združljivo z namestitvijo s sponko; Pripravljeno za integriran sistem (lastniško); Ni združljivo z interkomom; Žepi/izrezi za zvočnike; Drugo
ko: 호환 인터컴 시스템: 클램프 마운트 호환; 통합 시스템 호환(독점); 인터콤과 호환되지 않음; 스피커 포켓/컷아웃; 기타
de: Kompatibles Intercomsystem: Kompatibel mit Klemmhalterung; Vorbereitet für integriertes System (proprietär); Nicht Intercom-kompatibel; Lautsprecheraussparungen/-taschen; Sonstige
zh-CN: 适配的对讲系统: 兼容夹钳式安装; 支持集成系统（专有）; 不兼容对讲机; 扬声器预留位/开孔; 其他
pl: Zgodny system interkomu: Kompatybilne z uchwytem zaciskowym; Gotowe do zintegrowanego systemu (dedykowane); Niekompatybilne z interkomem; Kieszenie/wycięcia na głośniki; Inne
zh-TW: 相容的對講系統: 相容於夾式支架; 支援整合式系統 (專有); 不相容對講機; 揚聲器預留孔/凹槽; 其他
sv: Kompatibelt intercomsystem: Kompatibel med klämfäste; Förberedd för integrerat system (tillverkarspecifikt); Ej intercom-kompatibel; Högtalarfickor/utskärningar; Övrigt
vi: Hệ thống đàm thoại nội bộ tương thích: Tương thích ngàm kẹp; Hệ thống tích hợp sẵn (độc quyền); Không tương thích với intercom; Túi/Lỗ khoét cho loa; Khác
hr-HR: Kompatibilni interfonski sustav: Kompatibilno s nosačem sa stezaljkom; Spremno za integrirani sustav (vlasnički); Nije kompatibilno s interkomom; Džepovi/izrezi za zvučnike; Ostalo
fr: Système d'interphone compatible: Compatible avec support de serrage; Prêt pour un système intégré (propriétaire); Non compatible avec intercom; Emplacements/découpes pour haut-parleurs; Autre